Colorado, session 2026A, HB1275.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Short title. The short title of this act is the "Visible
and Accountable Policing Act".
SECTION 2. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) Colorado law enforcement operates with fidelity to Colorado
law. Local law enforcement have authority over their jurisdictions. It is
detrimental to the trust established between law enforcement and
community when federal agents act unlawfully and when there is
excessive use of force, constitutional violations, and absence of due
process.
(b) Colorado law must put visibility and public trust at the center
-2- HB26-1275

of law enforcement in Colorado, which includes requiring clear
identification and accountability for actions that impact community safety
and civil rights. Colorado law already prohibits law enforcement officers
from using crowd control methods such as tear gas, among other
physically harmful methods.
(c) Our nation has been shocked by the escalation of unlawful
actions by federal agents, which violate the first, fourth, and fifth
amendments to the United States constitution and have resulted in illegal
detentions, sudden and unprovoked use of force, the deaths of people with
no criminal record, and, in the case of at least two people, United States
citizens exercising their right to assemble and protest;
(d) Keith Porter was killed by an off-duty United States
immigration and customs enforcement (ICE) agent on New Year's Eve
2025 in Northridge, California;
(e) Silverio Villagas González, a man with no criminal record,
was shot by ICE agents in Franklin Park, Illinois, shortly after dropping
off his 2 children at school and daycare. Initially, he was accused of
driving his car at agents, but police footage subsequently proved
otherwise.
(f) Renee Nicole Good was killed by an ICE agent in
Minneapolis, Minnesota, on January 6, 2026. Not only was she shot 3
times at point blank range, including shots to the head, but agents refused
to allow aid to be rendered. Additionally, the shooter left the scene.
(g) Thirty-seven-year-old Alex Jeffrey Pretti, an intensive care
nurse described by the Minneapolis police chief as a United States citizen
and a federal worker, as well as a member of the American Federation of
Government Employees local 3669, with no criminal record, was shot
-3- HB26-1275

multiple times and killed by United States customs and border protection
agents in Minneapolis on January 24, 2026;
(h) Civil rights violations and clear law enforcement identification
violations were evident long before these shootings, including throughout
2025 during raids targeted at communities of color and with ICE regularly
concealing agency insignias and using unmarked vehicles to detain people
in their cars and at courthouses, schools, workplaces, homes, on the street,
and using public transport; and
(i) It is imperative that we protect all Coloradans and preserve
their civil rights. We all have a right to life, liberty, and the pursuit of
happiness. We all have a right to due process.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 24-31-908 as
follows:
24-31-908. Prohibition on peace officers concealing their
identity - required publishing of policy - exceptions - penalty.
(1) A PEACE OFFICER SHALL NOT CONCEAL THE PEACE OFFICER'S
IDENTITY, EXCEPT WHEN SPECIFICALLY NECESSARY TO DO SO DURING
UNDERCOVER OPERATIONS OR SITUATIONS NECESSITATING A PEACE
OFFICER TO WEAR A HAZARDOUS MATERIALS SUIT TO PROTECT AGAINST
EXPOSURE TO KNOWN TOXINS, IDENTIFIED AIRBORNE HAZARDS, OR
IMMINENT RISK OF PHYSICAL HARM FROM PROJECTILES, FIRE, SMOKE, OR
CHEMICAL IRRITANTS IN A SPECIFIC, ONGOING INCIDENT.
(2) A PEACE OFFICER SHALL NOT PARTICIPATE IN A
MULTIJURISDICTIONAL LAW ENFORCEMENT TASK FORCE WITH A LAW
ENFORCEMENT AGENCY FROM ANOTHER STATE OR A FEDERAL AGENCY IF
OFFICERS OF THE LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY FROM ANOTHER STATE OR
FEDERAL AGENCY KNOWINGLY CONCEAL THEIR IDENTITY.
-4- HB26-1275

(3) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO BELIEVES A PEACE OFFICER HAS VIOLATED
A PROVISION OF THIS SECTION MAY REPORT THE VIOLATION TO THE
ATTORNEY GENERAL'S OFFICE. THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL INFORM
THE P.O.S.T. BOARD OF A REPORTED VIOLATION.
(4) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY PROVISION OF LAW, THE P.O.S.T.
BOARD SHALL REVOKE THE CERTIFICATION OF A PEACE OFFICER IF, AFTER
AN INVESTIGATION AND HEARING PURSUANT TO THE RULES IN SECTION
24-31-303, THE BOARD DETERMINES THE PEACE OFFICER VIOLATED THIS
SECTION. IF A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER FROM ANOTHER STATE
VIOLATES THIS SECTION, THE P.O.S.T. BOARD SHALL DRAFT A DETAILED
REPORT DESCRIBING THE OFFICER'S CONDUCT AND SEND THE REPORT TO
THE OFFICER'S STATE POLICE OVERSIGHT BOARD OR AN EQUIVALENT
AGENCY.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 18-1-201.5 as
follows:
18-1-201.5. Jurisdiction over federal law enforcement officers
- immunity unavailable.
(1) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, A FEDERAL
LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER WHO COMMITS AN ACT IN THE STATE THAT
CONSTITUTES A VIOLATION OF STATE CRIMINAL LAW IS SUBJECT TO
ARREST, PROSECUTION, AND PUNISHMENT UNDER THE CRIMINAL LAWS OF
THE STATE TO THE SAME EXTENT AS ANY OTHER PERSON.
(2) TO THE MAXIMUM EXTENT ALLOWED PURSUANT TO THE
UNITED STATES CONSTITUTION, NO CRIMINAL IMMUNITY OR DEFENSE IS
AVAILABLE TO A CRIMINAL DEFENDANT DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (1) OF
THIS SECTION.
(3) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION LIMITS AN INDIVIDUAL'S RIGHT TO
-5- HB26-1275

PURSUE CIVIL REMEDIES FOR THE WRONGFUL ACT OF A FEDERAL LAW
ENFORCEMENT AGENCY OR OFFICER UNDER STATE OR FEDERAL LAW.
(4) PURSUANT TO THE AUTHORITY GRANTED IN SECTION 16-3-102,
A PEACE OFFICER MAY IMMEDIATELY ARREST A FEDERAL LAW
ENFORCEMENT OFFICER WHEN THE PEACE OFFICER HAS PROBABLE CAUSE
TO BELIEVE THAT THE FEDERAL OFFICER HAS COMMITTED A VIOLATION OF
STATE CRIMINAL LAW, REGARDLESS OF WHETHER THE ALLEGED CONDUCT
OCCURRED WHILE THE FEDERAL OFFICER WAS ACTING UNDER COLOR OF
FEDERAL AUTHORITY.
(5) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO ANY FEDERAL LAW ENFORCEMENT
OFFICER, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, AN OFFICER OR AGENT OF THE
UNITED STATES IMMIGRATION AND CUSTOMS ENFORCEMENT AGENCY AND
THE UNITED STATES CUSTOMS AND BORDER PROTECTION AGENCY, WHILE
PRESENT IN THE STATE.
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-8-802, add (1.7)
as follows:
18-8-802. Duty to report use of force by peace officers or law
enforcement animals - duty to intervene.
(1.7) A PEACE OFFICER, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 24-31-901 (3),
WHO IS ON DUTY SHALL INTERVENE TO PREVENT OR STOP A FEDERAL LAW
ENFORCEMENT OFFICER, INCLUDING A FEDERAL LAW ENFORCEMENT
OFFICER WHO IS THE HANDLER OF A LAW ENFORCEMENT ANIMAL, FROM
USING MORE THAN THE COMMENSURATE AMOUNT OF PHYSICAL FORCE A
PEACE OFFICER IS PERMITTED TO USE PURSUANT TO SECTION 18-1-707 IN
PURSUANCE OF THE FEDERAL LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER'S DUTIES IN
CARRYING OUT AN ARREST OF A PERSON, PLACING A PERSON UNDER
DETENTION, TAKING A PERSON INTO CUSTODY, BOOKING A PERSON, OR IN
-6- HB26-1275

THE PROCESS OF CROWD OR RIOT CONTROL, WITHOUT REGARD FOR CHAIN
OF COMMAND.
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-31-305, add
(1.5)(c) as follows:
24-31-305. Certification - issuance - renewal - revocation -
rules - definition.
(1.5) (c) THE P.O.S.T. BOARD SHALL DENY CERTIFICATION TO A
PERSON WHO HAS PREVIOUSLY BEEN EMPLOYED OR WHO IS CURRENTLY
EMPLOYED BY THE UNITED STATES IMMIGRATION AND CUSTOMS
ENFORCEMENT AGENCY OR UNITED STATES CUSTOMS AND BORDER
PROTECTION AGENCY.
SECTION 7. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 24-31-311.5 as
follows:
24-31-311.5. Basic training - certain required subjects - repeal.
(1) IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER BASIC TRAINING REQUIRED BY THE
P.O.S.T. BOARD, THE BOARD SHALL PRESCRIBE A UNIFORM TRAINING
REGARDING:
(a) CURRENT IMMIGRATION LAWS AND REQUIREMENTS;
(b) A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER'S LIMITATIONS ON WORKING
WITH THE UNITED STATES IMMIGRATION AND CUSTOMS ENFORCEMENT
AGENCY AND THE UNITED STATES CUSTOMS AND BORDER PROTECTION
AGENCY;
(c) A PEACE OFFICER'S DUTY TO INTERVENE PURSUANT TO SECTION
18-8-802 (1.7);
(d) EXCESSIVE FORCE POLICIES; AND
(e) A PEACE OFFICER'S JURISDICTIONAL LIMIT TO ENFORCE THE
LAW.
-7- HB26-1275

(2) A PEACE OFFICER SEEKING CERTIFICATION PURSUANT TO THIS
PART 3 MUST COMPLETE THE TRAINING REQUIRED BY THIS SECTION PRIOR
TO BEING CERTIFIED.
(3) (a) A CERTIFIED PEACE OFFICER ON THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF
THIS SECTION SHALL COMPLETE THE TRAINING REQUIRED BY THIS SECTION
NO LATER THAN JULY 1, 2027.
(b) THIS SUBSECTION (3) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JUNE 30, 2028.
SECTION 8. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-8-112, add (1.5)
as follows:
18-8-112. Impersonating a peace officer.
(1.5) A PERSON COMMITS IMPERSONATING A PEACE OFFICER IF THE
PERSON KNOWINGLY PERFORMS AN ACT OF A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER
WHILE KNOWINGLY CONCEALING THE PERSON'S IDENTITY, EXCEPT, IF THE
PERSON IS A PEACE OFFICER, WHEN CONCEALING THE PEACE OFFICER'S
IDENTITY IS SPECIFICALLY NECESSARY DURING UNDERCOVER OPERATIONS
OR SITUATIONS NECESSITATING A PEACE OFFICER TO WEAR A HAZARDOUS
MATERIALS SUIT TO PROTECT AGAINST EXPOSURE TO KNOWN TOXINS,
IDENTIFIED AIRBORNE HAZARDS, OR IMMINENT RISK OF PHYSICAL HARM
FROM PROJECTILES, FIRE, SMOKE, OR CHEMICAL IRRITANTS IN A SPECIFIC,
ONGOING INCIDENT.
SECTION 9. Applicability. This act applies to offenses and
violations committed on or after the effective date of this act.
SECTION 10. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
-8- HB26-1275